Hawaii statutes.
§572B-8 Record of solemnization; reported
by whom; affidavit; evidentiary weight of certificate or affidavit. (a)
Each person who solemnizes a civil union shall certify upon the civil union
license certificate all the facts required to be stated in a standard
certificate of civil union, the form and contents of which shall be prescribed
by the department of health, and return the certificate to the department of
health within three business days following the solemnization of the civil
union, or as may otherwise be prescribed by the department of health.

(b) If any person who has solemnized a civil
union fails to return the certificate to the department of health as required
under subsection (a), the partners joined in a civil union may provide the department
of health with a notarized affidavit attesting to the fact that they were
joined in a civil union and stating the date and place of the solemnization of
the civil union. Upon the receipt of that affidavit by the department of
health, the civil union of the partners shall be deemed to be valid as of the
date of the solemnization of the civil union stated in the affidavit.

(c) The certificate required by subsection (a)
or an affidavit received pursuant to subsection (b) shall be prima facie
evidence of the facts stated therein. [L 2011, c 1, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 267,
§9]

Note

The 2012 amendment is retroactive to January 1, 2012. L
2012, c 267, §20.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next